Washington statutes.
RCW 42.48.030

Charge for costs of assistance.

In addition to the copying charges provided in RCW 42.56.120, a state agency may impose a reasonable charge for costs incurred in providing assistance in the following research activities involving personal records:

(1) Manual or computer screening of personal records for scientific sampling purposes according to specifications provided by the research professional;

(2) Manual or computer extraction of information from a universe or sample of personal records according to specifications provided by the research professional;

(3) Statistical manipulation or analysis of personal record information, whether manually or by computer, according to specifications provided by the research professional.

The charges imposed by the agency may not exceed the amount necessary to reimburse the agency for its actual costs in providing requested research assistance.

[ 2005 c 274 s 291; 1985 c 334 s 3.]